Washington statutes.
RCW 18.100.116

Death of shareholder, transfer to ineligible person—Treatment of shares.

(1) If:

(a)(i) A shareholder of a professional corporation dies;

(ii) A shareholder of a professional corporation becomes an ineligible person;

(iii) Shares of a professional corporation are transferred by operation of law or court decree to an ineligible person; or

(iv) A charitable remainder unitrust or charitable remainder annuity trust that holds shares of a professional corporation becomes an ineligible person; and

(b) The shares held by the deceased shareholder or by such ineligible person are less than all of the outstanding shares of the corporation, then

the shares held by the deceased shareholder or by the ineligible person may be transferred to remaining shareholders of the corporation or may be redeemed by the corporation pursuant to terms stated in the articles of incorporation or by laws of the corporation, or in a private agreement. In the absence of any such terms, such shares may be transferred to any individual eligible to be a shareholder of the corporation.

(2) If such a redemption or transfer of the shares held by a deceased shareholder or an ineligible person is not completed within twelve months after the death of the deceased shareholder or the transfer, as the case may be, such shares shall be deemed to be shares with respect to which the holder has elected to exercise the right of dissent described in chapter 23B.13 RCW and has made written demand on the corporation for payment of the fair value of such shares. The corporation shall forthwith cancel the shares on its books and the deceased shareholder or ineligible person shall have no further interest in the corporation other than the right to payment for the shares as is provided in RCW 23B.13.250. For purposes of the application of RCW 23B.13.250, the date of the corporate action and the date of the shareholder's written demand shall be deemed to be one day after the date on which the twelve-month period from the death of the deceased shareholder, or from the transfer, expires.

[ 1997 c 18 s 5; 1991 c 72 s 4; 1983 c 51 s 10.]